Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 22 Practice in Probate Courts

33-22-1.
Petitions in writing and signed — Notice to institution of petition concerning deceased inmate.

Every application, petition, or complaint to a probate court shall be in writing and signed by or in behalf of the party making the petition, and on the filing of certificate of death of an inmate of an institution maintained or controlled by the state, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the probate court to give written notice of the filing of the petition accompanying the same, to the commission, board, department, or division having the management or control of the institution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 764; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1575, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-1

.

33-22-2.
Contents of petition for probate or administration.

Whenever any petition shall be filed for the probate of a will or for the first grant of original or ancillary administration in this state, the petitioner shall set forth under oath in the petition:

The title of the proceeding and the name and address of the petitioner.

The domicile of the decedent, together with any other facts upon which the jurisdiction of the probate court to which the petition is directed may depend.

So far as known to the petitioner:

The names and post office addresses of the surviving spouse and heirs at law. Provided, however, if no heirs at law are listed, the petitioner shall file an affidavit under oath setting forth what efforts the petitioner has made to locate heirs at law.

If the person is under the age of eighteen (18) years, his or her age, post office address, and the names and post office addresses of his or her parents, or such of them as may be living, and of his or her guardian or guardians if any.

If the person is an adjudged incompetent, the name and post office address of his or her guardian or guardians if any, and the name and post office address of the person or institution having the care or custody of the incompetent.

If the petition is for the allowance of a will, it shall also contain the names and post office addresses of the named beneficiaries entitled to take there under to the extent that they are different than the heirs at law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 20; P.L. 1951, ch. 2742, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3022, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-2

; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 7; P.L. 1990, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 315, § 1.

33-22-3.
Notice given by petitioner on filing of petition and hearing.

In addition to the notice prescribed by §

33-7-9

, and to notice by publication in the manner as prescribed by §

33-22-11

, the petitioner or his or her attorney shall, at least ten (10) days before the date set for hearing on the petition, send or cause to be sent by mail, postage prepaid, addressed to each person whose name and post office address is by §

33-22-2(3)

required to be set forth in the petition, as the names and addresses are set forth therein or as then known to the petitioner, notice of the filing, the nature of the petition, and of the time and place set for hearing on the petition, or in lieu thereof a copy of the newspaper notice published pursuant to the provisions of §

33-22-11

; provided, however, that in the case of any person entitled to notice hereunder whose post office address is outside the continental limits of the United States this notice shall be sent at least three (3) weeks before the date set for the hearing; and provided further that the petitioner or his or her attorney shall not be required to send this notice to any person sui juris who shall at, or prior to, the hearing waive notice of its pendency in writing either on the petition or by instrument separately filed. The petitioner or his or her attorney shall at or prior to the hearing file or cause to be filed an affidavit that the notice was given, setting forth the names and post office addresses of the persons to whom the notice was sent and the date of mailing of the notice, together with a copy of the notice.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 21; P.L. 1951, ch. 2742, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3022, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-3

; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 11, § 8; P.L. 2013, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 96, § 1.

33-22-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 22; P.L. 1951, ch. 2742, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3022, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-4

; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 1, effective July 2, 2014; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 2, 2014.

33-22-5.
Waiver of notice.

If all interested parties shall, in writing, waive the notice required by §

33-22-3

and assent to action upon the petition by the court at any time, the court may proceed to hear the cause without publication or further notice and any decree entered in the proceeding shall be of the same force and effect as if notice had been given in the manner provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 23; P.L. 1951, ch. 2742, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-5

; P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 2.

33-22-6.
Additional notice given — Failure to comply.

The notice prescribed by §

33-7-9

and the notice by publication in the manner as prescribed by §

33-22-11

shall also be given in all cases in which notice by mail is required by §

33-22-3

, unless waived in writing by the persons entitled to such notice, but failure to comply with any of the provisions in §§

33-22-2

and

33-22-3

shall not defeat the jurisdiction of the court or affect adversely the regularity of any proceedings in which the failure shall have occurred, and upon discovery of the failure the court may make such further orders as the circumstances may require.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 24; P.L. 1951, ch. 2742, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3022, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-6

; P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 2.

33-22-7.
Proceedings in which notice given by court.

Every probate court shall, before proceeding, give notice to all parties known to be interested in the following cases:

In the granting of letters of administration.

In the probate of a will.

In the appointment or approval of a conservator or guardian.

In any complaint for the removal of an executor, administrator, conservator, or guardian.

In the making of any decree upon the account of an executor, conservator, or guardian.

In any petition of an executor, administrator, conservator, or guardian for leave to sell real estate of the testator, intestate, or ward.

In setting off and allowing real estate in fee, or the proceeds of sale thereof, to a widow or surviving husband.

Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to limit the court’s discretion to order whatever notice it considers appropriate given the circumstances of the matter before it and whose interests may be affected by the court’s action.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 765; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 2; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1640, § 7; P.L. 1919, ch. 1787, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-7

; P.L. 1992, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 2.

33-22-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 766; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 3; P.L. 1918, ch. 1640, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-8

; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 1, effective July 2, 2014; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 2, 2014.

33-22-9.
Notice of account containing credit for sale or mortgage of real estate.

Whenever the account of any executor, administrator or guardian contains a credit of the proceeds of any sale or mortgage of real estate, or of any interest therein, the notice given before the settling of this account shall state that the account contains the credit.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 774; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-9

.

33-22-10.
Notice in discretion of court.

In all other cases in which notice is not required by law, the court may, in its discretion, before proceeding, order notice.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 767; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-10

.

33-22-11.
Notice by advertisement.

In all cases in which notice is required and special provision is not made for it, it shall be given by advertisement of a notice once a week for at least two (2) weeks, the first advertisement to be published at least fourteen (14) days before the first of any hearing dates contained in such notice, in a newspaper printed in English and published or previously published in the county and presently distributed in the city or town or in a newspaper having general circulation within the county in which the matter is to be acted upon, as the probate court by general rule or special order may designate for that purpose; provided, however, that when a probate court shall give, or order to be given, notice by advertisement in a newspaper that has furnished the court with a definite schedule of prices for this advertising, the court shall require the cost of the advertising to be paid to the clerk of the court in advance, and the court shall pay over each month to the newspaper the sums so paid in, upon proof that the notice has been advertised as ordered; provided, however, that any advertisement affecting probate matters in the town of New Shoreham shall be given in a newspaper printed in English and published or previously published in the county and presently distributed in the counties of Washington and/or Providence.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 768; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 5; G.L. 1916, ch. 1357, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1913, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-11

; P.L. 1963, ch. 84, § 4; P.L. 1969, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 573, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 407, § 1.

33-22-12.
Notice by service or mail.

Notice may also be given, in addition to the foregoing, in any one of the following modes:

By causing a citation to be served, if within this state, by a deputy sheriff, town sergeant, or constable, and, if outside the state, by some disinterested person, upon all known parties interested, at least seven (7) days before proceeding. The citation shall give notice of the subject matter of the proceeding and of the time and place thereof, and shall be served by reading the citation to each of the parties or by leaving an attested copy of the citation with him or her or at his or her last and usual place of abode with some person living there. If service is made outside the state, the person making the service shall make return under oath of the manner in which, the time when, and the place where service was made.

By mailing notice to all persons interested whose post office addresses are known.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 768; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 5; G.L. 1916, ch. 1357, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-12

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 63.

33-22-13.
Advertisement in foreign language newspaper or other notice.

The court may also, in addition to the foregoing modes, order notice by advertisement in a newspaper published in other than the English language, or in such other manner as the case may require.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 769; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-13

.

33-22-14.
Findings of court as to notice.

If it shall appear to the court, before proceeding, that notice has been given to all known parties interested, in accordance with the foregoing provisions, and in a manner satisfactory to the court, it shall be sufficient to warrant proceeding; and its findings as to notice, unless appealed from, shall be conclusive. Notice by telephone, facsimile, e-mail, or other electronic transmission may supplement, but shall not discharge any party’s obligation under this chapter to give notice by service or mail.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 770; P.L. 1907, ch. 1461, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-14

; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 2.

33-22-15.
Dispensation with notice by assent of parties.

The notice required by law in any proceeding in a probate court may be dispensed with if all parties entitled thereto assent in writing to the proceeding.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 771; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-15

.

33-22-16.
Probate forms.

The legislative commission established under chapter 26 of this title shall prescribe the forms to be used by the probate courts and for the records thereof, which shall be printed, and furnished by the secretary of state or his or her designee to the clerks of the probate courts, to attorneys admitted to practice before the courts of this state, and to the public, without charge. All probate courts shall also furnish the forms without charge to parties and attorneys, and may require all parties to use them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1310, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 574, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-16

; P.L. 1969, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 339, § 1.

33-22-17.
Representation of unborn, unascertained, and incompetent persons.

When before or at the hearing on any proceeding in a probate court it appears to the court that the interest of a person unborn, unascertained, or legally incompetent to act in his or her own behalf, is not fully represented, the court may appoint some competent and disinterested person to act as guardian ad litem, or next friend, for the person unborn, unascertained, or legally incompetent, and to represent his or her interest in the case. The person so appointed shall make oath to perform his or her duty faithfully and impartially, and shall be entitled to such reasonable compensation, out of the estate, for his or her services, as the court may allow. In any action involving wills, estates, trusts or fiduciaries in the probate court, a minor, an incapacitated person or an unborn or unascertained person whose identity and location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, unless otherwise represented, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent that: (1) the person’s interest is adequately represented; and (2) there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 779; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-17

; P.L. 2004, ch. 573, § 2.

33-22-18.
Administration of oaths.

Oaths required in proceedings in probate courts may be administered by the judge or clerk, in or out of court, or by a notary public or justice of the peace; and when administered out of court, a certificate thereof shall be returned and filed or recorded with the proceedings, but the judge may require any oath to be taken in open court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 776; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-18

.

33-22-19.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 775; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-19

; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 1, effective July 2, 2014; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 2, 2014.

33-22-19.1.
Record of probate court proceedings.

At the request of any party thereto, or at the request of the probate judge presiding thereat, any proceedings held in probate court shall be recorded by the probate clerk, by either electronic or stenographic means (the means utilized to be determined by the probate clerk), which means are reasonably designed to produce a true and accurate verbatim transcription of such proceedings.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit a party from privately recording or transcribing any probate court proceeding at his or her own expense, which private recording or transcript shall not be deemed part of the record of proceedings unless admitted by the probate court into evidence as an exhibit, ordered by the probate court or stipulated to by the parties. Nothing contained herein shall preclude a party from purchasing a transcript from the stenographer. This section shall not be construed as requiring a party to record or transcribe the proceeding in order to take an appeal to superior court.

No city or town shall be obligated to assist a party to produce a written or typed transcription from any proceeding other than in instances where an appeal is claimed pursuant to the provisions of §

33-23-1

et seq. In the event such an appeal is claimed, the appellant shall be responsible for all transcription costs. If the city or town utilizes electronic means to record proceedings, the probate clerk shall, upon request, provide the appellant’s stenographer with accommodations to transcribe the original tape recording on site or provide a true copy thereof to permit transcription off site. Physical possession of the original recording or transcription notes shall remain with the probate court unless otherwise ordered by the superior court. The written transcript and electronic recording shall be deemed a public record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 10; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 1.

33-22-19.2.
Hearings in probate courts — Evidence and discovery.

In uncontested matters and/or matters on waiver, the Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the supreme court, may be used as a guide, but need not be followed, for the admission or exclusion of evidence.

In all contested matters, the Rhode Island Rules of Evidence shall be applied; provided, however, that this section shall not prohibit parties from stipulating or waiving the requirements of the Rules of Evidence as to any particular matter.

In all contested matters, the Rhode Island Superior Court Rules of Civil Procedure may be applied. The probate court may limit the scope of discovery to what is relevant to the contested issue before it and may shorten or enlarge deadlines for compliance as the circumstances warrant.

In all matters, the probate court shall have the jurisdiction and discretion to compel discovery, award costs and fees, impose sanctions and otherwise to enforce its orders consistent with Rule 37 of the Rhode Island Superior Court Rules of Civil Procedure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 10; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 1.

33-22-20.
Deposit of money paid into registry.

Whenever money is directed to be paid into the registry of the probate court, the court shall forthwith deposit the money in one of the institutions for savings or in one of the trust companies of this state. This deposit shall be made in the name of the probate court and shall be subject to the order of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 780; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 19.

33-22-21.
Fees enumerated — Hearing date to be noted on receipt.

The fees in probate courts shall be as follows: for every petition for the appointment of a custodian, administrator, guardian, or conservator, or for the probate of a will, one percent (1.0%) of the personal property of the decedent or ward over which the court has jurisdiction, but in no event shall the fee be less than thirty dollars ($30.00) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500); for every petition of a foreign administrator, executor, or guardian to transfer or sell real or personal estate, one percent (1.0%) of the personal property of the decedent, or ward located in Rhode Island, but in no event shall the fee be less than thirty dollars ($30.00) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) which fees shall be in lieu of all subsequent filing and recording fees in the same proceedings, except as hereinafter provided, and shall be paid before the petition is filed, and shall be based upon estimates submitted by the petitioner or someone on his or her behalf, and shall be subject to revision whenever it appears that the estimates were incorrect, and upon revision a further payment or rebate shall be made promptly. In the event that the appointment of a custodian, pending the appointment of an administrator, guardian, or conservator, or the probate of a will, is necessary, the fee so paid for the petition shall be applied on the amount to be paid upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of the administrator, guardian, or conservator, or for the probate of the will. The court at any time may cite in and examine any custodian, executor, administrator, guardian, or conservator for the purpose of determining the full fee due and payable. Also, the following fees shall be charged:

For every petition to file a claim out of time, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For every petition for the removal of an executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other fiduciary, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For every petition for appointment of a successor guardian under the uniform gifts to minors act, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For every petition to file a will with no probate, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For every affidavit of complete administration, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For every certificate of appointment, five dollars ($5.00);

For every petition to remove or fill a vacancy of a trustee of any trust established under a will, or the termination of such trust, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For every petition for tax minimization or estate planning, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For every petition for change of name, thirty dollars ($30.00); and

For every petition for adoption, thirty dollars ($30.00).

Upon payment of any fee enumerated in this section, the clerk of the court shall issue a written receipt to the person making payment. In the event that the matter filed with the court calls for a hearing, the clerk of the court shall note the hearing date and time on the receipt whenever possible; otherwise, as soon as is practicable after the filing of the matter, the clerk of the court shall provide written notice of the hearing date and time directly to the person filing the matter.

The clerk of the court shall charge one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per page and three dollars ($3.00) to certify any probate documents on file with the probate court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1464, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 39; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 574, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-21

; P.L. 1977, ch. 246, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 11; P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 2.

33-22-22.
Fees excused on veterans’ guardianships.

No probate fees shall be charged in any estate where the appointment of a guardian is for the purpose of receiving benefits of the laws administered by the United States veterans administration.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 574, § 2; P.L. 1945, ch. 1595, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-22

.

33-22-23.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1464, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 574, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-23

; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 351, § 1, effective July 2, 2014; P.L. 2014, ch. 398, § 1, effective July 2, 2014.

33-22-24.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1464, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 574, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-24

; Repealed by P.L. 1977, ch. 246, § 3.

33-22-25.
Payment of fees into local treasury — Power to provide for fixed salaries.

Any city council, or any town at the annual town meeting, may provide for the payment into the city or town treasury of all fees allowed the probate court or probate clerk, or both, and may allow in lieu of a fee a salary for the town council, probate judge, or probate clerk for their services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1464, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 321, § 43; G.L. 1923, ch. 372, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 574, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-25

.

33-22-26.
Cost and fees in contested and appealed cases — Persons deemed parties of record.

In cases contested before a probate court or on appeal from the probate court, costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees in the discretion of the court may be awarded to either party to be paid by the other, or to either or both parties to be paid out of the estate which is the subject of the controversy, as justice may require. Any person petitioning or objecting to a petition shall be deemed to be a party of record in the matter in which he or she appears.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 777; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-26

; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 1.

33-22-27.
Execution for cost and fees.

When costs and/or fees are awarded to be paid by one party to the other pursuant to §

33-22-26

, the probate court may issue execution for costs in like manner as a court of common law.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 778; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-27

; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 1.

33-22-28.
Name change.

In every petition for change of name in the probate court, the judge shall grant or deny the petition without consideration of presence or absence of spousal consent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 63, § 1.

33-22-29.
Local rules of probate court.

The probate court of each city or town shall promulgate local administrative rules designed to facilitate the efficient discharge of the statutory duties of such court; provided, however, that no such local administrative rule shall expand, contract or otherwise vary any specific provision of title 33 or any other provision of the General Laws. Such local administrative rules shall include the following: the dates and times when the court is in session; procedures for docketing of cases at hearings of the court; the scheduling of special sessions; and deadlines for the submission of pleadings or other filings. Such local administrative rules shall be clearly posted in the office of the probate clerk and copies of such rules shall be available to any interested party from the probate clerk.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 10.

33-22-30.
Probate court docket and special sessions.

Dockets of matters at regular sessions of the probate court shall be prepared by the clerk and heard by the court in such a way as to ensure that formal and uncontested matters are heard before contested matters. The probate court may hold such additional special sessions as reasonably necessary to hear contested matters without additional fees or charges therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 10.

33-22-31.
Form of order and decree.

Every decision of a probate court shall be reduced to a written order or decree, promptly executed by the probate judge, entered and filed in a timely fashion by the probate clerk. No party can rely upon any action, inaction or instructions of the probate court nor take an appeal from any decision of the probate court that has not been reduced to a written order or decree duly executed by the probate judge.

If a form of order or decree is not available for execution by the probate judge at the time of hearing, the court shall require the prevailing party to submit a proposed form of order or decree by regular mail to all parties who have entered an appearance in the matter. Absent written objection setting forth the reason for such objections by any such party within seven (7) days after mailing, the prevailing party shall file the original thereof with the probate court. Such order or decree shall contain a certificate that notice has been given pursuant to this subsection.

For all purposes, the effective date of an order or decree is the date executed by the probate judge and not the date of hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 10.